Hawaii statutes.
[§346G-10] Private hospital payments through enhanced rates to
medicaid managed care health plans. (a) The department shall use
moneys solely from the hospital sustainability program special fund to fulfill
the requirements of section 346G-4(c).

(b) In accordance with title 42 Code of
Federal Regulations section 438, the department shall use revenues from the
hospital sustainability fee and federal matching funds to enhance the capitated
rates paid to medicaid managed care health plans for the state fiscal year
2016-2017, consistent with the following objectives:

(1) The rate enhancement shall be used exclusively
for increasing reimbursements to private hospitals to support the availability
of services and to ensure access to care to the medicaid managed care health
plan enrollees;

(2) The rate enhancement shall be made part of the
monthly capitated rates by the department to medicaid managed care health
plans, which shall provide documentation to the department and the hospital
trade association located in Hawaii certifying that the revenues received under
paragraph (1) are used in accordance with this section;

(3) The rate enhancement shall be actuarially sound
and approved by the federal government for federal fund participation;

(4) The rate enhancements shall be retroactive to July
1, 2012, or the effective date approved by the federal government, whichever is
later. Retroactive rate enhancements shall be paid within thirty days of
notification by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to the
department for all necessary approvals; and

(5) Payments made by the medicaid managed care health
plans shall be made within thirty business days upon receipt of monthly
capitation rates from the department.

(c) If federal approval pursuant to section
346G-7 is not received until after the end of any month for which the hospital
sustainability fee is applicable, the department shall make the initial monthly
payments within five days after receipt of the hospital sustainability fee for
the respective month.

(d) To the extent the hospital sustainability
program is not effective for the entire year, the hospital sustainability fee,
the state medicaid expenses and administrative fee, and the corresponding
medicaid managed care health plan payments shall be based on the proportion of
the fiscal year the program is in effect. [L 2012, c 217, pt of §2, §5; am L
2013, c 141, pt of §1, §2; am L 2014, c 123, §§1(3), (4), 2; am L 2015, c 70,
§§1(5), 2; am L 2016, c 60, §2(5)]

Revision Note

In subsection (b)(4), "July 1, 2012" substituted
for "the effective date of this Act".

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next